Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB2160.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The title and sections 101 and 102 of the act of June 27, 1996 (P.L.403, No.58), known as the Community and Economic Development Enhancement Act, are amended to read:AN ACTTo enhance [community and economic] housing and community development in this Commonwealth by restructuring certain 12345678910111213141516171819202122232425 administrative functions and entities; changing the name of the [Department of Commerce to the] Department of Community and Economic Development to the Department of Housing and Community Development; transferring functions of the Department of Community Affairs into the Department of [Community and Economic] Housing and Community Development and other agencies; providing for a Deputy Secretary for [Community Affairs and] Housing and Community Development in the Department of [Community and Economic] Housing and Community Development; establishing the Center for Local Government Services and the Local Government Advisory Committee; establishing the Small Business Advocacy Council; conferring powers and duties on the Legislative Reference Bureau; and making repeals.Section 101. Short title.This act shall be known and may be cited as the [Community and Economic] Housing and Community Development Enhancement Act.Section 102. Declaration of purpose.It is the purpose of this act to more effectively address the problems of Pennsylvania's communities by recognizing that [community development and economic] housing and community development are inextricably linked, by expanding and providing for the more efficient delivery of local services, by effecting the maximum feasible coordination of [community and economic] housing and community development resources to restore and maintain the vigor of our communities, by advancing the economic well-being of communities through the maximization of [community and economic] housing and community development resources, by promoting housing and community revitalization in conjunction with economic development activities, by providing greater 20260HB2160PN2803 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 opportunity for local jurisdictions to be fully represented in State government and by providing a one-stop agency to carry out the [community and economic] housing and community development programs which are of vital importance to all areas of this Commonwealth.Section 2. The definitions of "department" and "secretary" in section 103 of the act are amended to read:Section 103. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this act shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:* * *"Department." The Department of [Community and Economic] Housing and Community Development of the Commonwealth."Secretary." The Secretary of [Community and Economic] Housing and Community Development of the Commonwealth.* * *Section 3. Sections 104, 301 heading, (a) introductory paragraph, (b) and (c), 302 heading and introductory paragraph, 305(a), 306(a), 502, 901, 1103(b), 1104, 1107 and 2103(c) of the act are amended to read:Section 104. Name change.To reflect the enhancement and consolidation of [community and economic] housing and community development functions, the [Department of Commerce shall hereafter be known as the] Department of Community and Economic Development shall hereafter be known as the Department of Housing and Community Development.Section 301. To Department of [Community and Economic] Housing and Community Development.(a) Transfers.--The following functions of the Department of 20260HB2160PN2803 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Community Affairs are transferred to the Department of [Community and Economic] Housing and Community Development:* * *(b) Functions to be consolidated.--The functions transferred to the department shall be consolidated within the department into a bureau, division, section or other organizational entity devoted to [community and economic] housing and community development. The Governor shall appoint a Deputy Secretary for [Community Affairs and] Housing and Community Development. The deputy secretary shall have the powers and perform the functions and duties transferred to the department in subsection (a) as well as other such functions and duties authorized by the Governor.(c) Center for Local Government Services established.--A Center for Local Government Services shall be established and maintained in the department to serve as the link between the Commonwealth and local governments. The center shall be a provider of services to local governments, shall serve as the point of contact for local governments on issues and problems of local concern, shall be responsible for coordinating State program resources in response to local issues and problems and shall establish a systematic process for addressing local issues and problems involving the resources of more than a single agency. In carrying out its responsibilities, the center shall use and have access to the information, services, functions and other resources transferred under subsection (a). The center shall, when authorized by the Governor, use and have access to any other information, services, functions and other resources in the possession of executive agencies under the Governor's jurisdiction deemed necessary to the fulfillment of its 20260HB2160PN2803 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 responsibilities. The center shall provide to local governments, at no cost, information on purchase contracts for materials, supplies and equipment entered into by the Department of General Services in which local governments may participate pursuant to the provisions of section 2403(h) of The Administrative Code of 1929. The Deputy Secretary for [Community Affairs and] Housing and Community Development shall be responsible for the administration of the center and shall report in writing to the Governor and Lieutenant Governor on the activities of the center. The center shall have permanent staff both in its headquarters as well as in the regional offices of the Governor and shall additionally make a toll-free telephone number available to local governments to assist the center in accommodating requests for assistance. Funding for the center shall be provided by the department.* * *Section 302. To Department of [Community and Economic] Housing and Community Development.The functions of the Department of Community Affairs provided for in the following statutes, or selected portions of statutes, are transferred to the Department of [Community and Economic] Housing and Community Development:* * *Section 305. Subjects of transfer.(a) General rule.--The subjects of transfer from the Department of Community Affairs under this chapter are transferred to the Department of [Community and Economic] Housing and Community Development, the Pennsylvania Historical and Museum Commission, the Pennsylvania Emergency Management Agency and the Department of Transportation, respectively, with 20260HB2160PN2803 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 the same force and effect as if those subjects of transfer had originally belonged to or had been incurred or entered into by those entities.* * *Section 306. Regulations.(a) Authorization.--The Department of [Community and Economic] Housing and Community Development, the Department of Transportation, the Pennsylvania Historical and Museum Commission and the Pennsylvania Emergency Management Agency shall have the power and duty to promulgate regulations to administer the respective functions transferred to each under this chapter.* * *Section 502. Powers and duties.The Local Government Advisory Committee shall serve as an advocate and representative of local government before both the Governor and the Center for Local Government Services in the Department of [Community and Economic] Housing and Community Development. It shall, among other things, make recommendations to the Governor and the center with regard to both the needs of local governments and the best manner in which the center can service those needs. The committee shall provide advice to the center with regard to the promulgation of forms and regulations in connection with performance of the functions transferred to the department under this act.Section 901. Board of Property.The Board of Property as provided for in section 202 of the act of April 9, 1929 (P.L.177, No.175), known as The Administrative Code of 1929, is hereby placed and made a departmental administrative board in the Department of 20260HB2160PN2803 - 6 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 [Community and Economic] Housing and Community Development.Section 1103. Membership on Pennsylvania Housing Finance Agency.* * *(b) Chairperson.--The Secretary of [Community and Economic] Housing and Community Development shall continue to be a member of the Pennsylvania Housing Finance Agency, and on and after the effective date of this act, the Secretary of Banking shall serve as chairperson of that agency.Section 1104. Membership on the Board of Property.In place of the membership of the Secretary of Community Affairs on the Board of Property under section 406 of the act of April 9, 1929 (P.L.177, No.175), known as The Administrative Code of 1929, the Secretary of [Community and Economic] Housing and Community Development shall serve on that board. The General Counsel shall be a member of the Board of Property in place of the Attorney General, and on and after the effective date of this act, the Secretary of the Commonwealth shall be the chairperson of the Board of Property.Section 1107. Membership on the Community Service Advisory Board.In place of the membership of the Secretary of Community Affairs on the Community Service Advisory Board as provided in section 2207-B(b) of the act of April 9, 1929 (P.L.177, No.175), known as The Administrative Code of 1929, the Secretary of [Community and Economic] Housing and Community Development shall serve on that board.Section 2103. Repeals and references.* * *(c) References.--20260HB2160PN2803 - 7 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (1) In accordance with subsection (b), all references to the Department of Community Affairs, which shall cease to exist pursuant to this act, and to the Secretary of Community Affairs in affected acts and portions of acts shall now be deemed to refer to the Department of [Community and Economic] Housing and Community Development and Secretary of [Community and Economic] Housing and Community Development, respectively, unless otherwise provided by this act.(2) All references to the Department of Commerce and the Secretary of Commerce in affected acts and portions of acts shall now be deemed to be references to the Department of [Community and Economic] Housing and Community Development and the Secretary of [Community and Economic] Housing and Community Development, respectively, unless otherwise provided by this act.(3) Beginning on the effective date of this paragraph all references to the Deputy Secretary for Community Affairs, shall now be deemed to refer to the Deputy Secretary for Housing and Community Development unless otherwise provided by this act.(4) Beginning on the effective date of this paragraph, references to the Department of Community and Economic Development and the Secretary of Community and Economic Development in affected acts and portions of acts shall now be deemed to be references to the Department of Housing and Community Development and the Secretary of Housing and Community Development, respectively, unless otherwise provided by this act.Section 4. Section 2104 of the act is repealed:[Section 2104. Implementation.20260HB2160PN2803 - 8 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Implementation of the provisions of this act shall begin immediately and shall be fully completed on or before July 1, 1996.]Section 5. Sections 2105 and 2106 of the act are amended to read:Section 2105. Performance audit.The House of Representatives shall direct the Legislative Budget and Finance Committee to conduct a performance audit every two years on the Department of [Community and Economic] Housing and Community Development. The final audit shall be concluded four years from the effective date of this act. The audit shall specifically include a comprehensive program evaluation of all community development programs administered by the department in conjunction with the provisions of this act. In addition, the audit shall evaluate the delivery costs of the local government service provided by the department.Section 2106. Existing office supplies and materials.The Department of [Community and Economic] Housing and Community Development shall continue to use or recycle all forms, stationery, business cards and other office supplies or materials which contain references to its predecessor department until the existing supplies and materials are depleted.Section 6. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20260HB2160PN2803 - 9 - 1234567891011121314151617181920212223